Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-909
Department of Correctional Services; surplus property; act for recipient; negotiate with appropriate agencies and institutions.

The Department of Correctional Services shall, upon behalf of the state, and may, upon behalf of any political subdivision, instrumentality, and tax-supported institution of the state, be designated to act for the recipient and negotiate with the appropriate agencies and institutions of the United States for the purchase or receipt of surplus property under such regulations as may be prescribed by federal law.

Laws 1945, c. 234, § 3, p. 693;

Laws 1977, LB 548, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 536, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 767, § 1.